da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenapparater – tilbehør: Tilbehør til airfryer; Brødbager – tilbehør; Kassemaskiner og espressomaskiner; Tilbehør til komfurer, kogeplader og ovne; Candyflossmaskine – tilbehør; Frituregryde – tilbehør; Opvaskemaskine – tilbehør; Tilbehør til elkedler; Tilbehør til elektriske pander og wokke; Fonduesæt – tilbehør; Tørreovn til mad – tilbehør; Tilbehør til foodprocessorer; Foodprocessortilbehør; Tilbehør til frysere; Affaldskværn – tilbehør; Ismaskine – tilbehør; Isknusere og iskværne - tilbehør; Tilbehør til ismaskiner; Saftpresser – tilbehør; Mikrobølgeovn – tilbehør; Udendørsgrill – tilbehør; Pastamaskine – tilbehør; Popcornmaskine – tilbehør; Kogeblus – tilbehør; Tilbehør til emhætter; Køleskab – tilbehør; Tilbehør til riskogere; Tilbehør til slow cookere; Tilbehør til sodavandsmaskiner; Tilbehør til varmebord; Tilbehør til brødristere; Vakuumforsegler – tilbehør; Tilbehør til vaffeljern; Vandkøler – tilbehør; Tilbehør til vinkøleskabe; Yoghurtmaskine – tilbehør
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Dodatki za kuhinjske aparate: Dodatki za cvrtnike na vroč zrak; Dodatki za aparate za peko kruha; Dodatki za aparate za kavo in aparate za espresso; Dodatki za kuhalne plošče, pečice in štedilnike; Dodatki za aparate za pripravo sladkorne vate; Dodatki za cvrtnike; Deli in dodatki za pomivalne stroje; Dodatki za električne grelnike vode; Električna ponev in pribor za vok; Dodatki za komplete za fondi; Dodatki za dehidrator hrane; Dodatki za mešalnike hrane; Dodatki za kuhinjske robote; Dodatki za zamrzovalnik; Dodatki za odstranjevanje odpadkov; Dodatki za aparate za sladoled; Dodatki za drobilce in brivnike za led; Dodatki za aparate za sladoled; Dodatki za sokovnike; Dodatki za mikrovalovne pečice; Dodatki za zunanje žare; Dodatki za strojčke za testenine; Dodatki za aparate za pokovko; Dodatki za štedilnike; Dodatki za kuhinjske nape; Dodatki za hladilnike; Dodatki za kuhalnike riža; Dodatki za naprave za počasno kuhanje; Dodatki za aparate za gaziranje; Dodatki za parno mizo; Dodatki za opekače kruha; Dodatki za aparate za vakuumiranje; Dodatki za pekač za vaflje; Dodatki za vodne hladilnike; Dodatki za hladilnike za vino; Dodatki za aparate za pripravo jogurta
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Аксесоари за кухненски уреди: Аксесоари за фритюрници с горещ въздух; Аксесоари за хлебопекарни; Аксесоари за кафемашини и машини за еспресо; Аксесоари за готварски плотове, фурни и печки; Аксесоари за машини за захарен памук; Аксесоари за фритюрници; Части и аксесоари за съдомиялни; Аксесоари за електрически кани; Аксесоари за електрически тиган и уок; Аксесоари за фондю; Аксесоари за дехидратор за храна; Аксесоари за кухненски миксери; Аксесоари за кухненски робот; Аксесоари за фризер; Аксесоари за изхвърляне на боклук; Аксесоари за машина за сладолед; Аксесоари за ледотрошачки и машини за скреж; Аксесоари за ледогенератор; Аксесоари за сокоизстисквачка; Аксесоари за микровълнова печка; Аксесоари за грил на открито; Аксесоари за машина за паста; Аксесоари за машина за пуканки; Аксесоари за преносими готварски печки; Аксесоари за аспиратор; Аксесоари за хладилник; Аксесоари за оризоварки; Аксесоари за уреди за бавно готвене; Аксесоари за машина за газирана вода; Аксесоари топла витрина; Аксесоари за тостери; Аксесоари за машина за вакуумиране; Аксесоари за гофретници; Аксесоари за охладители за вода; Аксесоари за хладилник за вино; Аксесоари за уред за кисело мляко
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Acessórios de aparelhos domésticos: Acessórios para fritadeiras sem óleo; Acessórios para máquinas de pão; Acessórios para máquinas de café e expresso; Acessórios para placa de fogão, forno e fogão; Acessórios para máquina de algodão doce; Acessórios para fritadeira; Peças e acessórios para máquina de lavar louça; Acessórios para chaleira elétrica; Acessórios para frigideira e wok elétricos; Acessórios para conjunto de fondue; Acessórios para desidratadores de alimentos; Acessórios para misturadora; Acessórios para processadores de alimentos; Acessórios para congelador; Acessórios para eliminação de lixo; Acessórios para máquina de gelados; Acessórios para picadores e trituradores de gelo; Acessórios para máquina de gelo; Acessórios para máquina de sumo; Acessórios para forno micro-ondas; Acessórios para grelhador de exterior; Acessórios para máquina de pasta; Acessórios para máquina de pipocas; Acessórios para fogão portátil; Acessórios para exaustor; Acessórios para frigorífico; Acessórios para panela de arroz; Acessórios para panelas de cozimento lento; Acessórios para máquinas de gaseificação; Acessórios para mesas de vapor; Acessórios para torradeira; Acessórios para máquina de selar; Acessórios para máquina de waffles; Acessórios para refrigerador de água; Acessórios para frigorífico de vinho; Acessórios para iogurteira
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aleti Aksesuarları: Air Fryer Aksesuarları; Ekmek Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Kahve Makinesi ve Espresso Makinesi Aksesuarları; Set Üstü, Fırın ve Ocak Aksesuarları; Pamuk Şeker Makinesi Aksesuarları; Fritöz Aksesuarları; Bulaşık Makinesi Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Elektrikli Su Isıtıcısı Aksesuarları; Elektrikli Tava ve Wok Aksesuarları; Fondü Seti Aksesuarları; Yiyecek Kurutucu Aksesuarları; Mutfak Robotu Aksesuarları; Mutfak Robotu Aksesuarları; Dondurucu Aksesuarları; Çöp Atma Aksesuarları; Dondurma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Buz Kırıcı ve Tıraşlayıcı Aksesuarları; Buz Yapıcı Aksesuarları; Meyve Sıkacağı Aksesuarları; Mikrodalga Fırın Aksesuarları; Bahçe Izgarası Aksesuarları; Makarna Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Mısır Patlatma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Taşınabilir Pişirme Ocağı Aksesuarları; Aspiratör Aksesuarları; Buzdolabı Aksesuarları; Pilav Makinesi Aksesuarları; Slow Cooker Aksesuarları; Asitli İçecek Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Benmari Servis Masası Aksesuarları; Ekmek Kızartma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Vakumlu Saklama Aksesuarları; Gözleme Izgarası Aksesuarları; Su Soğutucu Aksesuarları; Şarap Dolabı Aksesuarları; Yoğurt Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliance Accessories: Air Fryer Accessories; Breadmaker Accessories; Coffee Maker & Espresso Machine Accessories; Cooktop, Oven & Range Accessories; Cotton Candy Machine Accessories; Deep Fryer Accessories; Dishwasher Parts & Accessories; Electric Kettle Accessories; Electric Skillet & Wok Accessories; Fondue Set Accessories; Food Dehydrator Accessories; Food Mixer Accessories; Food Processor Accessories; Freezer Accessories; Garbage Disposal Accessories; Ice Cream Maker Accessories; Ice Crusher & Shaver Accessories; Ice Maker Accessories; Juicer Accessories; Microwave Oven Accessories; Outdoor Grill Accessories; Pasta Maker Accessories; Popcorn Maker Accessories; Portable Cooking Stove Accessories; Range Hood Accessories; Refrigerator Accessories; Rice Cooker Accessories; Slow Cooker Accessories; Soda Maker Accessories; Steam Table Accessories; Toaster Accessories; Vacuum Sealer Accessories; Waffle Iron Accessories; Water Cooler Accessories; Wine Fridge Accessories; Yogurt Maker Accessories
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria do sprzętów kuchennych: Akcesoria do frytownic beztłuszczowych; Akcesoria do wypieku chleba; Akcesoria do ekspresów do kawy i espresso; Akcesoria do płyt kuchennych, piekarników i kuchenek; Akcesoria do maszyn do waty cukrowej; Akcesoria do frytownic; Części i akcesoria do zmywarek; Akcesoria do czajników elektrycznych; Akcesoria do rondli i woków elektrycznych; Akcesoria do zestawów do fondue; Akcesoria do suszarek do żywności; Akcesoria do mikserów kuchennych; Akcesoria do robotów kuchennych; Akcesoria do zamrażarek; Akcesoria do usuwania odpadów; Akcesoria do maszynek do lodów; Akcesoria do kruszarek do lodu; Akcesoria do maszynek do lodu; Akcesoria do wyciskarek soków; Akcesoria do mikrofalówek; Akcesoria do grilla na zewnątrz; Akcesoria do maszynek do makaronu; Akcesoria do maszynek do popcornu; Akcesoria do kuchenek przenośnych; Akcesoria do okapów kuchennych; Akcesoria do lodówek; Akcesoria do ryżowarów; Akcesoria do wolnowarów; Akcesoria do syfonów; Akcesoria do bemarów; Akcesoria do tosterów; Akcesoria do pakowarek próżniowych; Akcesoria do maszynek do gofrów; Akcesoria do dystrybutorów wody; Akcesoria do chłodziarek do wina; Akcesoria do maszynek do jogurtu
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 부대용품: 에어프라이어 부대용품; 제빵기 부대용품; 커피 메이커/에스프레소 머신 부대용품; 쿡탑/오븐/레인지 부대용품; 솜사탕 기계 부대용품; 튀김기 부대용품; 식기세척기 부품/부대용품; 전기 주전자 부대용품; 전기 스킬릿/웍 부대용품; 퐁뒤 세트 부대용품; 식품 건조기 부대용품; 푸드 믹서 액세서리; 푸드프로세서 부대용품; 냉동고 부대용품; 음식물 쓰레기 처리기 부대용품; 아이스크림 제조기 부대용품; 얼음 분쇄기/빙수기 부대용품; 제빙기 부대용품; 주서기 부대용품; 전자레인지 부대용품; 야외용 그릴 부대용품; 파스타 메이커 부대용품; 팝콘 메이커 부대용품; 휴대용 레인지 부대용품; 레인지 후드 부대용품; 냉장고 부대용품; 전기밥솥 액세서리; 슬로우 쿠커 액세서리; 탄산수 제조기 부대용품; 스팀 테이블 부대용품; 토스터 부대용품; 진공 포장기 부대용품; 와플기 부대용품; 냉수기 부대용품; 와인 냉장고 부대용품; 요거트 메이커 부대용품
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Accesorios para aparatos de cocina: Accesorios para freidoras de aire; Accesorios de horno de pan; Accesorios para cafeteras; Accesorios para placas de cocción, hornos y cocinas de gas; Accesorios para máquina de algodón dulce; Accesorios para freidoras; Accesorios y piezas de lavavajillas; Accesorios para hervidores de agua; Accesorios para sartenes y woks eléctricos; Accesorios para juegos de fondue; Accesorios para deshidratadores de alimentos; Accesorios para batidoras; Accesorios para procesadores de alimentos; Accesorios para congeladores; Accesorios para la eliminación de basura; Accesorios para heladeras; Accesorios para granizadoras y picadoras de hielo; Accesorios para máquinas de hielo; Accesorios para exprimidores; Accesorios para microondas; Accesorios para barbacoas; Accesorios para hacer pasta; Accesorios para máquinas de palomitas; Accesorios para fogones portátiles; Accesorios para campana de cocina; Accesorios de frigorífico; Accesorios para ollas arroceras; Accesorios para ollas de cocción lenta; Accesorios para generadores de agua carbonatada; Accesorios para mesas de vapor; Accesorios para tostadoras; Accesorios de envasado al vacío; Accesorios de sartenes para gofres; Accesorios para refrigeradores de agua; Accesorios para neveras de vinos; Accesorios para yogurteras
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Zubehör für Küchengeräte: Heißluftfritteusen-Zubehör; Zubehör für Brotbackautomaten; Zubehör für Kaffee- & Espressomaschinen; Zubehör für Herdplatten, Backöfen und Küchenherde; Zubehör für Zuckerwattemaschinen; Fritteusenzubehör; Spülmaschinenteile & -zubehör; Zubehör für Wasserkocher; Zubehör für elektrische Pfannen & Woks; Fonduesetzubehör; Dörrautomatenzubehör; Mixerzubehör; Zubehör für Food Processors; Zubehör für Gefrierschränke; Küchenabfallzerkleinerer-Zubehör; Speiseeismaschinenzubehör; Zubehör für Eis-Crusher & Eis-Shaver; Zubehör für Eismaschinen; Entsafterzubehör; Mikrowellenzubehör; Außengrillzubehör; Nudelmaschinenzubehör; Zubehör für Popcornmaschinen; Zubehör für Campingöfen; Dunstabzugshauben-Zubehör; Kühlschrankzubehör; Reiskocher-Zubehör; Zubehör für Schongarer; Zubehör für Trinkwassersprudler; Zubehör für Warmhaltetheken; Toasterzubehör; Vakuumiererzubehör; Zubehör für Waffeleisen; Wasserspenderzubehör; Weinkühlschrank-Zubehör; Zubehör für Joghurtmaschinen
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Accessoires voor keukenmachines: Accessoires voor airfryers; Accessoires voor broodmachines; Accessoires voor koffiezetapparaten en espressomachines; Accessoires voor kookplaten, ovens en fornuizen; Accessoires voor suikerspinmachines; Accessoires voor frituurpannen; Accessoires voor vaatwasmachines; Accessoires voor waterkokers; Accessoires voor elektrische koekenpannen en wokken; Accessoires voor fonduesets; Accessoires voor voedsel drogen; Accessoires voor keukenmixers; Accessoires voor keukenrobots; Accessoires voor diepvriezers; Accessoires voor vuilnisbakken; Accessoires voor ijsmachines; Accessoires voor ijscrushers en -schavers; Accessoires voor ijsmakers; Accessoires voor fruitpersen; Accessoires voor magnetrons; Accessoires voor barbecues; Accessoires voor pastamakers; Accessoires voor popcornmakers; Accessoires voor draagbare fornuizen; Accessoires voor afzuigkappen; Koelkastaccessoires; Accessoires voor rijstkokers; Slowcooker accessoires; Accessoires voor frisdrankmachines; Accessoires voor warmhoudtafels; Accessoires voor broodroosters; Accessoires voor vacuümapparaten; Accessoires voor wafelijzers; Accessoires voor waterkoelers; Accessoires voor wijnkoelkasten; Accessoires voor yoghurtmakers
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos de cozinha: Acessórios para Air Fryer; Acessórios para panificador; Acessórios para máquina de café e para máquina de café expresso; Cooktop, forno e acessórios para cozinhar; Acessórios para máquina de algodão doce; Acessórios para fritadeira; Acessórios para lava-louças; Acessórios para chaleiras elétricas; Acessórios para panela wok e frigideira elétricas; Acessórios para conjuntos de fondue; Acessórios para desidratar alimentos; Acessórios para batedeira; Acessórios para processadores de alimentos; Acessórios para freezer; Acessórios para eliminação de resíduos; Acessórios para máquina de sorvete; Acessórios para máquina de fazer raspadinha; Acessórios para máquinas de fazer gelo; Acessórios para espremedores; Acessórios para micro-ondas; Acessórios para churrasqueira externa; Acessórios para máquina de massa; Acessórios para pipoqueiras; Acessórios para fogão portátil; Acessórios para coifa; Acessórios para geladeira; Acessórios para panela elétrica de arroz; Acessórios para panela elétrica lenta; Acessórios para máquinas de refrigerante; Acessórios para mesa térmica; Acessórios para torradeira; Acessórios para seladora a vácuo; Acessórios para máquina de waffle; Acessórios para bebedouros; Acessórios para adegas climatizadas; Acessórios para máquinas de fazer iogurte
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteiden lisätarvikkeet: Ilmafriteerauskeittimen lisävarusteet; Leiväntekotarvikkeet; Kahvinkeittimien ja espressokoneiden lisätarvikkeet; Lieden, uunin ja hellan lisätarvikkeet; Hattarakoneen lisätarvikkeet; Friteeraustarvikkeet; Astianpesukoneen osat ja tarvikkeet; Vedenkeittimen lisätarvikkeet; Sähköpariloiden ja -wokkien lisätarvikkeet; Fondue-setin lisätarvikkeet; Ruoan kuivaustarvikkeet; Yleiskoneiden tarvikkeet; Monitoimikoneen tarvikkeet; Pakastustarvikkeet; Jätemyllyn lisätarvikkeet; Jäätelökoneen lisätarvikkeet; Jäämurskainten lisätarvikkeet; Jääpalakoneen lisätarvikkeet; Mehustimen lisätarvikkeet; Mikroaaltouunin lisätarvikkeet; Ulkokäyttöisten grillien lisätarvikkeet; Pastakoneen lisätarvikkeet; Popcorn-koneen lisätarvikkeet; Retkikeittimen lisätarvikkeet; Liesituulettimen lisätarvikkeet; Jääkaapin lisätarvikkeet; Riisinkeittimen tarvikkeet; Haudutuspatojen tarvikkeet; Hiilihapotuslaitteen lisätarvikkeet; Lämpöhauteen lisätarvikkeet; Leivänpaahtimen lisätarvikkeet; Tyhjiöpakkauskoneen lisätarvikkeet; Vohveliraudan lisätarvikkeet; Vedenviilentimen lisätarvikkeet; Viinijääkaapin lisätarvikkeet; Jogurttikoneen lisätarvikkeet
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Tilbehør til kjøkkenapparater: Tilbehør til airfryere; Tilbehør til brødmaskiner; Tilbehør til kaffe- og espressomaskiner; Tilbehør til koketopper og ovner; Tilbehør til sukkerspinnmaskiner; Tilbehør til frityrapparater; Deler og tilbehør til oppvaskmaskiner; Tilbehør til vannkokere; Tilbehør til elektriske panner og woker; Tilbehør til fonduesett; Tilbehør til matdehydratorer; Tilbehør til kjøkkenmaskiner; Tilbehør til foodprosessorer; Tilbehør til frysere; Tilbehør til søppeltømmere; Tilbehør til iskremmaskiner; Tilbehør til isknusere og -høvler; Tilbehør til ismaskiner; Tilbehør til juicemaskiner; Tilbehør til mikrobølgeovner; Tilbehør til utendørsgriller; Tilbehør til pastamaskiner; Tilbehør til popcornmaskiner; Tilbehør til bærbare kokeapparater; Tilbehør til avtrekkshetter; Tilbehør til kjøleskap; Tilbehør til riskokere; Tilbehør til slowcooker; Tilbehør til brusmaskiner; Tilbehør til dampbord; Tilbehør for brødristere; Tilbehør for vakuummaskiner; Tilbehør for vaffeljern; Tilbehør for vannkjølere; Tilbehør for vinskap; Tilbehør for yoghurtmaskiner
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Pribor za kuhinjske aparate: Pribor za friteze; Pribor za pekač kruha; Dodaci za aparate za kavu i espresso aparate; Dodaci za kuhinjsku plohu, pećnicu i štednjak; Pribor za aparate za šećernu vunu; Pribor za friteze; Dijelovi i dodaci za perilice posuđa; Pribor za električna kuhala; Pribor za električne tave i wok; Kompleti pribora za fondue; Pribor za dehidratore hrane; Dodaci za mikser za hranu; Pribor za prerađivače hrane; Pribor za zamrzivač; Pribor za drobilice smeća; Pribor za aparate za sladoled; Dodaci za drobilice i strugače za led; Pribor za ledomate; Pribor za sokovnike; Pribor za mikrovalne pećnice; Pribor za vanjski roštilj; Pribor za aparate za izradu tjestenine; Pribor za kokičare; Pribor za prijenosni štednjak; Pribor za kuhinjske nape; Pribor za hladnjake; Dodaci za kuhalo za rižu; Dodaci za aparate za sporo kuhanje; Pribor za uređaje za gaziranje; Pribor za grijaće stolove; Pribor za toster; Pribor za vakuumiranje; Pribor za pekač za vafle; Pribor za hladnjake za vodu; Pribor za hladnjake za vino; Pribor za aparat za jogurt
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires petit électroménager: Accessoires pour friteuse à air; Accessoires pour machines à pain; Accessoires pour cafetières et machines à expresso; Accessoires pour plaques de cuisson, fours et cuisinières; Accessoires pour machines à barbe à papa; Accessoires pour friteuses; Pièces et accessoires pour lave-vaisselle; Accessoires pour bouilloires électriques; Accessoires pour woks et poêlons électriques; Accessoires pour fondues; Accessoires pour déshydrateurs alimentaires; Accessoires pour mixeurs alimentaires; Accessoires pour robots culinaires; Accessoires pour congélateurs; Accessoires pour broyeurs d’évier; Accessoires pour sorbetières; Accessoires pour broyeurs et pileurs de glace; Accessoires pour machines à glace; Accessoires pour presse-agrumes; Accessoires pour fours à micro-ondes; Accessoires de gril d’extérieur; Accessoires pour machines à pâtes; Accessoires pour machines à popcorn; Accessoires pour réchauds; Accessoires pour hottes aspirantes; Accessoires pour réfrigérateurs; Accessoires pour cuiseur à riz; Accessoires pour mijoteuse; Accessoires pour machines à gazéifier; Accessoires pour tables chaudes; Accessoires pour grille-pains; Accessoires d’emballage sous vide; Accessoires pour gaufriers; Accessoires pour fontaines à eau; Accessoires pour armoires à vin; Accessoires pour yaourtières
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisų priedai: Karšto oro gruzdintuvių priedai; Duonkepių priedai; Kavos ir espreso aparatų priedai; Kaitlenčių, orkaičių ir viryklių priedai; Cukraus vatos aparatai priedai; Gruzdintuvių priedai; Indaplovių dalys ir priedai; Elektrinių virdulio priedai; Elektrinių keptuvių ir vokų priedai; Fondiu rinkinių priedai; Maisto džiovyklių priedai; Maisto maišytuvų priedai; Virtuvės kombainų priedai; Šaldiklių priedai; Šiukšlių šalinimo priedai; Ledų gaminimo aparatų priedai; Ledo trupintuvų ir skustuvų priedai; Ledo gaminimo aparatų priedai; Sulčiaspaudžių priedai; Mikrobangų krosnelių priedai; Lauko kepsninių priedai; Makaronų gaminimo aparatų priedai; Spragėsių gaminimo priedai; Nešiojamųjų viryklių priedai; Gartraukių priedai; Šaldytuvų priedai; Ryžių viryklių priedai; Lėtojo virimo viryklių priedai; Vandens gazavimo aparatų priedai; Garinio šildymo stalų priedai; Skrudintuvų priedai; Vakuuminių sandariklių priedai; Vaflių keptuvių priedai; Vandens aušintuvų priedai; Vyno šaldytuvų priedai; Jogurto gaminimo aparatų priedai
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Phụ kiện đồ dùng nhà bếp: Phụ kiện nồi chiên không dầu; Phụ kiện máy làm bánh mì; Phụ kiện máy pha cà phê & máy pha cà phê espresso; Phụ kiện bếp, lò nướng & lò bếp; Phụ kiện máy làm kẹo bông; Phụ kiện đồ chiên ngập dầu; Bộ phận & phụ kiện máy rửa chén; Phụ tùng ấm điện; Phụ kiện chảo điện; Phụ kiện bộ nấu lẩu pho mai; Phụ kiện máy sấy thực phẩm; Phụ kiện máy trộn thực phẩm; Phụ kiện chế biến thực phẩm; Phụ kiện tủ lạnh; Phụ tùng thiết bị đổ rác; Phụ tùng máy làm kem; Phụ kiện máy bào và đập đá; Phụ kiện máy làm kem; Phụ kiện dụng cụ ép trái cây; Phụ kiện lò vi sóng; Phụ kiện nướng ngoài trời; Phụ kiện máy làm mỳ pasta; Phụ kiện máy làm bỏng ngô; Phụ kiện bếp di động; Phụ kiện máy hút mùi; Phụ kiện của tủ lạnh; Phụ kiện nồi cơm điện; Phụ Kiện Nồi Hầm Chậm; Phụ kiện máy làm soda; Phụ kiện khay hấp; Phụ kiện máy nướng bánh mì; Phụ kiện máy đóng gói hút chân không; Phụ kiện khuôn bánh quế; Phụ kiện cây nước nóng lạnh; Phụ kiện tủ lạnh ướp rượu; Phụ kiện máy làm sữa chua
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電関連用品: エアフライヤー用アクセサリー; ホームベーカリー関連用品; コーヒーメーカー・エスプレッソマシン関連用品; コンロ/オーブン/レンジ用品; 綿菓子メーカー関連用品; フライヤー関連用品; 食器洗浄機関連用品; 電子ポット用品、電子ケトル用品; 電気グリルパン関連用品; フォンデュセット関連用品; 食品乾燥機関連用品; フードミキサー関連用品; フードプロセッサー関連用品; 冷凍庫関連用品; ディスポーザー関連用品; アイスクリームメーカー関連用品; かき氷器関連用品; 製氷機関連用品; ジューサー関連用品; 電子レンジ関連用品; バーベキューグリル関連用品; パスタメーカー関連用品; ポップコーンメーカー関連用品; 携帯用コンロ関連用品; レンジフード関連用品; 冷蔵庫関連用品; 炊飯器関連用品; スロークッカー関連用品; ソーダメーカー関連用品; ウォーマーテーブル関連用品; トースター関連用品; 真空パック器関連用品; ワッフル焼き器用品; ウォータークーラー関連用品; ワインセラー関連用品; ヨーグルトメーカー関連用品
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice de bucătărie: Accesorii friteuză cu aer cald; Accesorii pentru mașini de pâine; Accesorii pentru cafetiere și espressoare; Accesorii pentru plită, cuptor și aragaz; Accesorii pentru mașină de vată de zahăr; Accesorii friteuze; Piese și accesorii mașini de spălat vase; Accesorii fierbător electric; Accesorii tigaie electrică și wok; Accesorii set fondue; Accesorii pentru aparate de deshidratare a alimentelor; Accesorii pentru mixer de alimente; Accesorii roboți de bucătărie; Accesorii congelator; Accesorii pentru tocătoare de resturi alimentare; Accesorii pentru mașina de înghețată; Accesorii mașină mărunțit gheață; Accesorii mașină de gheață; Accesorii storcător; Accesorii cuptor cu microunde; Accesorii pentru grătar în aer liber; Accesorii mașină de paste; Accesorii mașină de popcorn; Accesorii aragaz portabil; Accesorii hotă; Accesorii frigider; Accesorii pentru gătit orez; Accesorii pentru slow cooker; Accesorii aparate pentru preparat băuturi carbogazificate; Accesorii mese pentru încălzire alimente; Accesorii prăjitor de pâine; Accesorii aparat vidare; Accesorii aparat gofre; Accesorii dozator apă; Accesorii frigider pentru vinuri; Accesorii mașină de iaurt
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器配件: 氣炸鍋配件; 麵包機配件; 咖啡機/義式咖啡機配件; 爐具/烤箱/爐灶配件; 棉花糖機配件; 油炸機配件; 洗碗機零/件/配件; 電熱水壺配件; 電燒烤盤/電炒鍋配件; 瑞士火鍋組配件; 乾果機配件; 食物攪拌機配件; 食物處理機相關配件; 冰箱/冷凍櫃配件; 廢棄物處理相關配件; 冰淇淋機配件; 剉冰機/刨冰機配件; 製冰機配件; 果汁機配件; 微波爐配件; 戶外烤肉器具; 製麵機配件; 爆米花機配件; 卡式爐配件; 排油煙機配件; 冰箱配件; 電鍋配件; 慢燉鍋配件; 氣泡水機配件; 保溫餐台配件; 烤麵包機配件; 真空包裝機配件; 鬆餅機配件; 水冷卻器配件; 冷藏酒櫃配件; 優格機配件
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Tillbehör till köksapparater: Luftfritöstillbehör; Tillbehör till bakmaskiner; Tillbehör till kaffebryggare och espressomaskiner; Hällar, ugn och spis; Tillbehör till maskiner för spunnet socker; Fritöstillbehör; Diskmaskinstillbehör; Tillbehör för elgrytor; Tillbehör till elektriska stekpannor och wokkar; Tillbehör till fondueset; Tillbehör till matdehydrering; Tillbehör för matberedare; Tillbehör för matberedare; Frystillbehör; Tillbehör till avfallskvarnar; Tillbehör till glassmaskiner; Tillbehör till iskrossare och -hyvlar; Ismaskinstillbehör; Tillbehör till juicepressar; Tillbehör till mikrovågsugnar; Tillbehör till utomhusgrillar; Tillbehör till pastamaskiner; Tillbehör till popcornmaskiner; Tillbehör till campingkök; Spisfläkttillbehör; Kylskåpstillbehör; Tillbehör för riskokare; Tillbehör för slow cookers; Tillbehör till kolsyremaskin; Kokeritillbehör; Brödrosttillbehör; Tillbehör till vakuumförseglare; Tillbehör för våffeljärn; Tillbehör till vattenkylare; Vinkylstillbehör; Tillbehör till yogurtmaskiner
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในครัว: อุปกรณ์หม้อทอดไร้น้ำมัน; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำขนมปัง; อุปกรณ์เครื่องชงกาแฟ; อุปกรณ์เตา เตาอบ และเตาหุงต้ม; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำขนมสายไหม; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทอด; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เครื่องล้างจาน; อุปกรณ์กาต้มน้ำไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์กระทะทอดและกระทะเหล็กบางขนาดใหญ่ไฟฟ้า; ชุดหม้อฟองดูว์; อุปกรณ์เครื่องอบแห้งอาหาร; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องผสมอาหาร; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องเตรียมอาหาร; อุปกรณ์ช่องแข็ง; อุปกรณ์ที่กำจัดขยะ; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำไอศกรีม; อุปกรณ์บดและไสน้ำแข็ง; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; อุปกรณ์สำหรับที่คั้นน้ำผลไม้; อุปกรณ์เตาไมโครเวฟ; อุปกรณ์ปิ้งย่างกลางแจ้ง; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำพาสต้า; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำข้าวโพดคั่ว; อุปกรณ์เตาปรุงอาหารแบบพกพา; อุปกรณ์เครื่องดูดควัน; อุปกรณ์ตู้เย็น; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับหม้อหุงข้าว; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับหม้อตุ๋น; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำน้ำอัดลม; อุปกรณ์โต๊ะนึ่ง; อุปกรณ์เครื่องปิ้งขนมปัง; อุปกรณ์เครื่องแพ็คสุญญากาศ; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำวาฟเฟิล; อุปกรณ์ตู้น้ำเย็น; อุปกรณ์ตู้แช่ไวน์; อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำโยเกิร์ต
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Accessori strumenti cucina: Accessori per friggitrici ad aria; Accessori macchina per il pane; Accessori macchine da caffè e da espresso; Accessori per fornelli, forni e fuochi; Accessori macchina zucchero filato; Accessori frittura; Componenti e accessori per lavastoviglie; Accessori per cucine elettriche; Accessori per wok e padelle elettriche; Accessori per set di fondue; Accessori essiccazione cibo; Accessori per robot da cucina; Accessori per robot da cucina; Accessori per freezer; Accessori per lo smaltimento della spazzatura; Accessori macchina gelato; Accessori per tritaghiaccio; Accessori per macchine del ghiaccio; Accessori spremiagrumi; Accessori forno a microonde; Accessori grigliata esterni; Accessori macchina pasta; Accessori macchina popcorn; Accessori per fornelli da campeggio; Accessori per cappe; Accessori frigorifero; Accessori per cuociriso; Accessori per slow cooker; Accessori per gasatori; Accessori per scaldavivande a vapore; Accessori per tostapane; Accessori sacchetti sottovuoto; Accessori per crepiere; Accessori per dispenser d'acqua fredda; Accessori per frigoriferi dei vini; Accessori per yogurt
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhaigép-kiegészítők: Forró levegős sütő kiegészítők; Kenyérsütő-kiegészítők; Kávéfőző- és eszpresszógép-kiegészítők; Főzőlap-, sütő- és tűzhely-kiegészítők; Vattacukorgép-kiegészítők; Fritőzkiegészítők; Mosogatógép-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Elektromosvízforraló-kiegészítők; Elektromostepsi- és wok-kiegészítők; Fondue-készlet-kiegészítők; Élelmiszerszárító-kiegészítők; Konyhai robotgép kiegészítők; Ételfeldolgozó-kiegészítők; Fagyasztókiegészítők; Szemétszállítási kiegészítők; Fagylaltkészítő-kiegészítők; Jégzúzó- és jégdaráló-kiegészítők; Jégkészítő-kiegészítők; Gyümölcsfacsaró-kiegészítők; Mikrohullámúsütő-kiegészítők; Kültérigrill-kiegészítők; Tésztakészítő-kiegészítők; Popcorn-készítő-kiegészítők; Hordozhatótűzhely-kiegészítők; Páraelszívó-kiegészítők; Hűtőszekrény-kiegészítők; Rizsfőző kiegészítők; Lassúfőzőedény-tartozékok; Szódakészítő-kiegészítők; Gőzasztal-kiegészítők; Kenyérpirító-kiegészítők; Vákuumcsomagoló-kiegészítők; Gofrisütő-kiegészítők; Vízhűtő-kiegészítők; Borhűtő-kiegészítők; Joghurtkészítő-kiegészítők
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών: Αξεσουάρ φριτέζας αέρα; Αξεσουάρ αρτοπαρασκευαστών; Αξεσουάρ καφετιέρας & μηχανής εσπρέσο; Αξεσουάρ εστιών, φούρνων & κουζινών; Αξεσουάρ μηχανής μαλλιού της γριάς; Αξεσουάρ φριτέζας; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ πλυντηρίου πιάτων; Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικού βραστήρα; Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικού τηγανιού & γουόκ; Αξεσουάρ σετ φοντί; Αξεσουάρ αφυγραντήρων τροφίμων; Αξεσουάρ μίξερ; Αξεσουάρ επεξεργαστών τροφίμων; Αξεσουάρ καταψύκτη; Αξεσουάρ απόρριψης απορριμμάτων; Αξεσουάρ για παγωτομηχανές; Θρυμματιστές & τεμαχιστές πάγου; Αξεσουάρ παγομηχανών; Αξεσουάρ αποχυμωτών; Αξεσουάρ φούρνου μικροκυμάτων; Αξεσουάρ εξωτερικών ψησταριών; Αξεσουάρ για μηχανές ζυμαρικών; Αξεσουάρ για ποπ κορν; Αξεσουάρ για φορητές κουζίνες; Αξεσουάρ απορροφητήρα; Αξεσουάρ ψυγείου; Αξεσουάρ βραστήρα ριζιού; Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικής γάστρας; Αξεσουάρ παρασκευαστών αναψυκτικών; Αξεσουάρ τραπεζιών ατμού; Αξεσουάρ φρυγανιέρας; Αξεσουάρ συσκευών κενού αέρος; Αξεσουάρ βαφλιέρας; Αξεσουάρ ψυκτών νερού; Αξεσουάρ ψυγείων κρασιού; Αξεσουάρ παρασκευαστών γιαουρτιού
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器配件: 空气炸锅配件; 面包机配件; 咖啡机/浓缩咖啡机配件; 炉灶、烤箱与组合灶台配件; 棉花糖机配件; 油炸机配件; 洗碗机零件/配件; 电水壶配件; 电煮锅/电炒锅配件; 芝士火锅配件; 食品脱水器配件; 食物搅拌机配件; 食品加工机配件; 冷冻柜/冰柜; 食物垃圾粉碎机配件; 冰淇淋机配件; 刨冰机配件; 制冰机配件; 榨汁机配件; 微波炉配件; 户外烤炉配件; 面条机配件; 爆米花机配件; 便携式烹饪炉配件; 抽油烟机配件; 冰箱配件; 电饭煲配件; 慢炖锅配件; 汽水机配件; 热汤池配件; 烤面包机配件; 真空封口机配件; 华夫饼烤模配件; 饮水机配件; 电子酒柜配件; 酸奶机配件
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Príslušenstvo pre kuchynské spotrebiče: Príslušenstvo k horúcemu vzduchu; Príslušenstvo na pečenie chleba; Príslušenstvo pre kávovary a espressovary; Príslušenstvo pre varné dosky, rúry a sporáky; Príslušenstvo k strojom na výrobu cukrovej vaty; Príslušenstvo pre fritézy; Diely a príslušenstvo do umývačiek riadu; Príslušenstvo pre rýchlovarné kanvice; Príslušenstvo pre elektrické panvice a woky; Príslušenstvo pre fondue súpravu; Príslušenstvo pre sušičku potravín; Príslušenstvo pre kuchynské roboty; Príslušenstvo pre kuchynský robot; Príslušenstvo k mrazničke; Príslušenstvo na likvidáciu odpadu; Príslušenstvo pre zmrzlinovače; Príslušenstvo pre drviče ľadu; Príslušenstvo pre výrobníky ľadu; Príslušenstvo pre odšťavovače; Príslušenstvo pre mikrovlnnú rúru; Príslušenstvo pre externé grily; Príslušenstvo na výrobu cestovín; Príslušenstvo na výrobu pukancov; Príslušenstvo k prenosnému variču; Príslušenstvo k digestorom; Príslušenstvo pre chladničky; Príslušenstvo pre ryžovar; Príslušenstvo k peciam na pomalé pečenie; Príslušenstvo na výrobu sódy; Príslušenstvo k výdajnému stolu s ohrevom; Príslušenstvo pre hriankovače; Príslušenstvo pre vákuovú zváračku; Príslušenstvo pre vaflovače; Príslušenstvo pre výdajníky vody; Príslušenstvo pre chladničky na víno; Príslušenstvo pre jogurtovače
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče – příslušenství: Příslušenství pro horkovzdušné fritézy; Domácí pekárny – příslušenství; Kávovary a automaty na espreso – příslušenství; Příslušenství pro varné desky, plotny a vařiče; Stroje na cukrovou vatu – příslušenství; Fritézy – příslušenství; Myčky – příslušenství; Příslušenství pro rychlovarné konvice; Příslušenství k remoskám a elektrickým pánvím wok; Sady na fondue – příslušenství; Sušičky potravin – příslušenství; Příslušenství pro kuchyňské roboty; Příslušenství ke kuchyňským robotům; Příslušenství k mrazákům; Likvidace odpadu – příslušenství; Zmrzlinovače – příslušenství; Příslušenství k drtičům ledu; Příslušenství k výrobníkům ledu; Odšťavňovače – příslušenství; Mikrovlnné trouby – příslušenství; Venkovní grily – příslušenství; Mlýnky na těstoviny – příslušenství; Popkornovače – příslušenství; Přenosné vařiče – příslušenství; Příslušenství k digestořím; Ledničky – příslušenství; Příslušenství k rýžovarům; Příslušenství k pomalým hrncům; Příslušenství k výrobníkům perlivých nápojů; Příslušenství pro chafingy; Příslušenství k toustovačům a topinkovačům; Vakuové baličky – příslušenství; Příslušenství pro vaflovače; Chladiče vody – příslušenství; Příslušenstvím k vinotékám; Jogurtovače – příslušenství
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Аксессуары для кухонной техники: Аксессуары для аэрогрилей; Аксессуары для хлебопечек; Аксессуары для кофеварок и кофемашин; Аксессуары для варочных панелей, духовых шкафов и плит; Аксессуары для аппаратов для приготовления сладкой ваты; Аксессуары для фритюрниц; Детали и аксессуары для посудомоечных машин; Аксессуары для электрических чайников; Аксессуары для электрических сковород и воков; Аксессуары для наборов для фондю; Аксессуары для дегидраторов пищевых продуктов; Аксессуары для кухонных комбайнов; Аксессуары для кухонных комбайнов; Аксессуары для морозильных камер; Аксессуары для измельчителей пищевых отходов; Аксессуары для морожениц; Аксессуары для измельчителей и шейверов для льда; Аксессуары для льдогенераторов; Аксессуары для соковыжималок; Аксессуары для микроволновых печей; Аксессуары для уличных грилей; Аксессуары для паста-машин и лапшерезок; Аксессуары для аппаратов для приготовления попкорна; Аксессуары для портативных плит; Аксессуары для кухонных вытяжек; Аксессуары для холодильников; Аксессуары для рисоварки; Аксессуары для медленноварок; Аксессуары для сифонов для газирования воды; Аксессуары для паровых столов-мармитов; Аксессуары для тостеров; Аксессуары для вакууматоров; Аксессуары для вафельниц; Аксессуары для кулеров для воды; Аксессуары для винных шкафов; Аксессуары для йогуртниц